Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-912
Sections; construction.

It is the intention of the Legislature that sections 48-901 to 48-912 shall operate according to their terms to the full extent permitted by the Constitutions of the State of Nebraska and of the United States of America. In the event any section or part of sections 48-901 to 48-912, or the application thereof to any person or situation shall be held unconstitutional, sections 48-901 to 48-912 shall nevertheless continue in full effect with respect to all parts and applications thereof not so held to be unconstitutional.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 12, p. 810.